South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3814.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Surface Water Study Committee SECTION 1.    Proviso 117.184 in Act 226 of 2024 created a Surface Water Study Committee to study the current state of surface water in this State. The study committee was charged with making a report of its findings to the General Assembly by March 1, 2025. Scope of study committee SECTION 2.    The study committee is authorized to expand its scope to include a study of the current state of groundwater in this State as well as other topics related to surface water and groundwater. Study committee report SECTION 3.    The date that the study committee's report to the General Assembly is due is changed from March 1, 2025, to March 2, 2026. Effect of proviso SECTION 4.    Proviso 117.184 remains in full force and effect except for those provisions contained in this joint resolution in conflict with the provisions in the proviso. In that case, the provisions contained in this joint resolution shall control. Time effective SECTION 5.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________